District of Columbia statutes.
9-1211.01

Helicopter landing pads.

(a)

The operation of a helicopter landing pad, which was not in operation prior to July 14, 1987, in any residential district in the District of Columbia, identified in the Zoning Regulations of the District of Columbia and shown in the official atlases of the Zoning Commission for the District of Columbia, shall constitute a public nuisance.

(b)

The Corporation Counsel or affected members of the public may maintain an action in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia to abate and enjoin perpetually the nuisance.

Oct. 9, 1987, D.C. Law 7-40, § 2, 34 DCR 5333

History

1981 Ed., § 7-1439.

Prior Codifications